District of Columbia statutes.
22-3057

Jurisdiction.

A violation of § 22-3052, § 22-3053, or § 22-3054 shall be deemed to be committed in the District of Columbia if any part of the violation takes place in the District of Columbia, including when either the person depicted or the person who disclosed or published the sexual image was a resident of, or located in, the District of Columbia at the time that the sexual image was made, disclosed, or published.

May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-275, § 8, 62 DCR 16

History